Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 1. Witnesses Generally
§ 1-12-104.
Husband and wife as witnesses in civil and criminal cases.

No husband or wife shall
be a witness against the other except in criminal proceedings for
a crime committed by one against the other, or in a civil action or
proceeding by one against the other. They may in all civil and criminal
cases be witnesses for each other the same as though the marital relation
did not exist.

History.

Laws 1897, ch. 2, § 1; 1899, ch. 81, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3681; C.S. 1910, § 4536; C.S. 1920, § 5805; R.S. 1931, § 89-1702; C.S. 1945, § 3-2605; W.S. 1957, § 1-142; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-12-105

.

Cross references. —

For abrogation of any privilege between husband and wife in child abuse cases, see §

14-3-210

.

For provision making privilege of husband and wife inapplicable in an action for desertion of wife or children, see §

20-3-104

.

For provision making husband and wife privilege inapplicable in action under Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, see §

20-4-166

.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 2, ch. 2, Laws 1897, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

Origin of section. —

This section was originally a part of §

1-12-101

, relating to privileged communications. Stephens v. Short, 41 Wyo. 324, 285 P. 797,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1930).

Purpose. —

This statute is a codification of a common law privilege and the court looks to the common law history of the privilege in determining its purpose. Curran v. Pasek, 886 P.2d 272,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1994).

The primary purpose of the confidential marital communication privilege is to foster marital relationships by encouraging confidential communication between spouses and this is the primary purpose the Wyoming legislature intended to further when it enacted this statute. Curran v. Pasek, 886 P.2d 272,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1994).

The legislature codified the confidential marital communication privilege in this statute and intended to make the confidential marital communication privilege available to either spouse. Curran v. Pasek, 886 P.2d 272,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1994).

The confidential marital communication privilege is the privilege that ensures that private marital communications will remain private. Curran v. Pasek, 886 P.2d 272,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1994).

Witness spouse might directly invoke privilege against testifying

if called to testify against a party spouse in a criminal case. Engberg v. Meyer, 820 P.2d 70,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1991).

But wife refusing to testify against husband not made “unavailable
witness.” —

A wife's refusal to testify against her husband-defendant when called as a witness by the state in a criminal case did not make her an “unavailable witness” which would have, under Rule 804, W.R.E., justified the admission of the proffered hearsay testimony of another witness, who would have testified as to an earlier statement by the wife. Nothing in the statutes extends a privilege to the spouse when called by the defendant in a criminal case. In order for the defendant to have demonstrated “unavailability” to him, he would have had to call his wife as a witness and, if she then had continued to refuse to testify, the court could have found that she was unavailable and the hearsay testimony possibly would have been admissible. Engberg v. Meyer, 820 P.2d 70,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1991).

Privilege does not apply to acts that are in no way communicative.
—

It is generally accepted that the confidential marital communication privilege extends to communications and not to acts that are in no way communicative. Curran v. Pasek, 886 P.2d 272,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1994).

Privilege does not apply when spouse charges crime against
the other. —

Defendant's wife, who was an alleged victim spouse, could be compelled by the state to testify against defendant because the marital privilege did not apply when one spouse was charged with a crime against the other.
Rogers v. State, 2008 WY 90, 189 P.3d 265,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2008).

Privilege not applicable where spouse not witness against spouse.
—

Where the evidence in question at trial is not presented by one spouse as a witness against the other, but rather is the product of the defendant himself, then the extension of the privilege to such circumstances clearly exceeds the limits of this doctrine. Nisonger v. State, 581 P.2d 1094,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1978).

Or where child of wife wronged. —

Cases in which there is a wrong against the child of the wife fall within this section's exception applicable to “criminal proceedings for a crime committed by one [spouse] against the other,” because the wrong affecting the wife is different from that suffered by the public in general, and it is not the policy of this state to encourage defendants to silence their spouses in child abuse or child homicide cases. Seyle v. State, 584 P.2d 1081,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 237

(Wyo. 1978).

Circumstances of utterance factor in confidentiality. —

Whether a particular statement is a privileged confidential marital communication depends on the nature and character of the communication as well as the circumstances surrounding the utterance. The communication must be delivered during marriage and in confidence. Curran v. Pasek, 886 P.2d 272,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1994).

Confidentiality of no consequence. —

Under this section and §

1-12-101

, one spouse is rendered incompetent to testify against the other irrespective of such testimony being related to confidential communications. Fox v. Fox, 75 Wyo. 390, 296 P.2d 252,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1956).

But bar against matters not confidential does not survive termination
of marriage. —

The bar against matters not confidential, unlike that against confidential communications, does not continue after the termination of the marriage relationship. Fox v. Fox, 75 Wyo. 390, 296 P.2d 252,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1956).

Confidential communications between spouses should be protected after the death of either one of the spouses, as well as after termination of the marriage from other cause. But, unless precluded by the express terms of a statute or for some other reason, adverse testimony may be given by a former spouse against the other or against the estate of the other, except as to confidential communications received during coverture. Fox v. Fox, 75 Wyo. 390, 296 P.2d 252,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1956).

Communications held not confidential. —

A widow could not claim immunity under this section from testifying as to messages relayed by her from plaintiff to her husband, and from her husband to plaintiff, during a phone conversation between her and plaintiff, since such communications could not be considered confidential. Fox v. Fox, 75 Wyo. 390, 296 P.2d 252,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1956).

Defendant's statement to his wife is robbed of any confidential aspect because it was made in the presence and hearing of a child and the child testified to it. Chamberlain v. State, 348 P.2d 280,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1960).

The privilege does not attach when the confidentiality of the communication is destroyed by revealing it in the presence of a third party. Curran v. Pasek, 886 P.2d 272,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1994).

Privilege not applicable when obvious marital status should
no longer endure. —

While the preservation of the marital relation is a matter of primary importance as a matter of public and social policy, when it becomes obvious that the marriage should no longer endure, the injury to the marital status which results from permitting the wife to testify against her husband cannot be greater than is the benefit to society by its insuring that justice be done. Chamberlain v. State, 348 P.2d 280,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1960).

Privilege survives death. —

The confidential marital communications privilege survives the death of either spouse. To rule otherwise would thwart the very purpose of the confidential marital communication privilege. Curran v. Pasek, 886 P.2d 272,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1994).

Exception broader than “cases involving corporal violence.”
—

That the legislature intended something more than to declare the common law exception of “cases involving corporal violence,” by this section is made plain by its use of the broader phrase “crimes against the other,” which means nothing more nor less than a “wrong” against the other. Chamberlain v. State, 348 P.2d 280,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1960).

“Crime” against other means “wrong” against other. —

Legalistically speaking, a crime is never “committed by one against the other” but rather, against the state, so offenses against an individual are civil wrongs. A “crime” against the other, as used in this section, means nothing more nor less than a “wrong” against the other. Chamberlain v. State, 348 P.2d 280,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1960).

Hence, wife permitted to testify when she has suffered a special,
particular and personal wrong. —

It is within the purview of this section that the wife be considered a competent witness and be permitted to testify against her husband because she has suffered a special, particular and personal wrong through his rapacious assault upon her child. Chamberlain v. State, 348 P.2d 280,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1960).

Invoking the privilege. —

The privilege of spousal immunity may be invoked by the spouse who does not wish to be the instrumentality of condemnation directed at his or her partner. Curran v. Pasek, 886 P.2d 272,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1994).

When a wife testifies for her husband,

she is subject to contradiction and impeachment. Strand v. State, 36 Wyo. 78, 252 P. 1030,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1927).

Test for determining whether communication protected by privilege.
—

The supreme court finds the rationale underlying the “intentions test” persuasive and adopts it as the rule in Wyoming. This test treats assertive conduct that is intended to communicate a confidential message from one spouse to another as a confidential marital communication. Curran v. Pasek, 886 P.2d 272,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1994).

The “intentions test” is a flexible analytical tool that allows a court to avoid erecting barriers to the truth while still protecting conduct that is intended to convey confidential messages between spouses. Curran v. Pasek, 886 P.2d 272,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1994).

Expectation of confidentiality may not determine protection
under privilege. —

Conduct that is undertaken in reliance on the confidence of the marital relationship, i.e., with an expectation of confidentiality, is not necessarily considered a confidential marital communication. Curran v. Pasek, 886 P.2d 272,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1994).

Prosecution may comment on defendant's failure to call wife
as witness. —

Since, under this section, the wife of a defendant is a competent witness for him but not for the prosecution, it is proper for the prosecuting attorney to comment upon defendant's failure to produce her as a witness. State v. Spears, 76 Wyo. 82, 300 P.2d 551,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1956).

Generally, where a witness is equally available to both parties, the failure to call the witness is not the proper subject of comment; however, where the witness is the defendant's spouse and can assert the marital privilege because she is then available to the defendant but not to the government, reference to the defendant's failure to call her is not error. Fortner v. State, 835 P.2d 1155,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1992).

Waiver of objection. —

Defendant executrix waived objection to testimony of plaintiff's husband where she subjected the husband to cross-examination as to matters not gone into upon his direct examination. Fox v. Fox, 75 Wyo. 390, 296 P.2d 252,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1956); Chamberlain v. State, 348 P.2d 280,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1960).

Having chosen to have his wife testify as a witness, defendant is in no position to argue about his “forced” election

between waiving the defendant's right to not have his wife testify against him or have the transcript of her previous testimony introduced. Simms v. State, 492 P.2d 516,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 409 U.S. 886, 93 S. Ct. 104, 34 L. Ed. 2d 142, 1972 U.S. LEXIS 1757 (U.S. 1972).

Only the party spouse may waive privilege. —

Only the party spouse can waive the confidential marital communication privilege with respect to information communicated in confidence to the other spouse. Curran v. Pasek, 886 P.2d 272,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1994).

The spouse against whom confidential marital communications are offered must waive the confidential marital communication privilege before the witness spouse can testify regarding those confidential marital communications. Once the party spouse has waived the confidential marital communication privilege, the non-party spouse may then elect to invoke or waive the privilege of spousal immunity. Curran v. Pasek, 886 P.2d 272,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1994).

If the party spouse refuses to waive the confidential marital communication privilege, the witness spouse cannot testify even if he or she waives the spousal immunity privilege. Curran v. Pasek, 886 P.2d 272,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1994).

Privilege may be waived

by signing of consent form authorizing censorship of mail during booking procedure. Nisonger v. State, 581 P.2d 1094,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1978).

The party spouse may voluntarily waive the confidential marital communication privilege. To waive the confidential marital communication privilege, the party spouse must, in some way, destroy the confidentiality of the communication. Curran v. Pasek, 886 P.2d 272,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1994).

Testimony of spouse over objection not prejudicial error per
se. —

No authority exists for the proposition that the mere testifying over objection by the spouse is prejudicial error per se. Pike v. State, 495 P.2d 1188,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1972).

Where testimony of defendant's wife on direct examination was most meager

and added nothing to the evidence before the court, including the admissions of defendant, there was no prejudicial error in receiving her testimony. Pike v. State, 495 P.2d 1188,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1972).

Testimony harmless where corroborates other witnesses. —

In a civil proceeding by a mother and father against each other, the current wife, who was not a party, should not have been permitted to testify, even though the father and current wife were separated; nevertheless, since the current wife's testimony merely corroborated the testimony of other witnesses, including the father and his son, the admission of the testimony was harmless. Pinther v. Pinther, 888 P.2d 1250,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1995).

In a joint trial of a husband and wife for aggravated robbery,

it was not error to permit the wife to testify as follows: (1) she denied having a gun during the encounter with the victim or that she or her husband were engaged in any wrongdoing; and (2) she placed her husband at the scene of the crime, but did so for purposes of showing that her husband rescued her from the victim. Amin v. State, 695 P.2d 1021,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 449

(Wyo. 1985).

Law reviews. —

See note, “Spouse's Testimony in Criminal Cases,” 19 Wyo. L.J. 35 (1964).

For discussion of husband-wife testimonial privilege and the Federal Rules of Evidence, see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 601 (1977).

For case note, “Wyoming's New Missing Witness Rule, Seyle v. State, 584 P.2d 1081,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 237

(Wyo. 1978),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 569 (1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Conversations between husband and wife relating to property or business as within rule excluding private communications between them, 4 ALR2d 835.

“Communications” within testimonial privilege of confidential communications between husband and wife as including knowledge derived from observations by one spouse of acts of other, 10 ALR2d 1389.

Crimes against spouse within exception permitting testimony by one spouse against another in criminal prosecution, 11 ALR2d 646.

Effect of divorce or annulment on competency of one former spouse as witness against other in criminal prosecution, 38 ALR2d 570.

Calling or offering accused's spouse as witness for prosecution as prejudicial misconduct, 76 ALR2d 920.

Spouse as competent witness for or against cooffender with other spouse, 90 ALR2d 648.

Crime directed against spouse but taking effect against third person as within exception to rule of incompetency of husband or wife, 36 ALR3d 820.

Competency of husband or wife to testify to nonaccess, 49 ALR3d 212.

Competency of one spouse to testify against other in prosecution for offense against child of both or either, 93 ALR3d 1018.

Effect, on competency to testify against spouse or on marital communication privilege, of separation or other marital instability short of absolute divorce, 98 ALR3d 1285.

Existence of spousal privilege where marriage was entered into for purpose of barring testimony, 13 ALR4th 1305.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of prosecutor's argument commenting on failure of defendant's spouse to testify, 26 ALR4th 9.

Communications between spouses as to joint participation in crime as within privilege of interspousal communications, 62 ALR4th 1134.

Crimes against spouse within exception permitting testimony by one spouse against other in criminal prosecution—modern state cases, 74 ALR4th 223.

Competency of one spouse to testify against other in prosecution for offense against third party as affected by fact that offense against spouse was involved in same transaction, 74 ALR4th 277.

Competency of one spouse to testify against other in prosecution for offense against child of both or either or neither, 119 ALR 5th 275.

Immunity's sufficiency to meet federal grand jury witness' claim of privilege against adverse spousal testimony, 82 ALR Fed 600.

“Communications” within testimonial privilege of confidential communications between husband and wife as including knowledge derived from observation by one spouse of acts of other spouse. 23 A.L.R.6th 1.

§ 1-12-105.
Right of witness to demand fees; failure to pay; payments noted.

After the case is called
for trial and before a witness is sworn, he may demand his traveling
fees and fees for one (1) day’s attendance. If the fees are not paid
he is not obliged to testify. At the commencement of the trial each
day after the first day he may demand his fees for that day’s attendance
and if the fees are not paid he shall not be compelled to remain.
The clerk shall note the payment of fees in the witness book.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 259; R.S. 1887, § 2599; R.S. 1899, § 3693; C.S. 1910, § 4548; C.S. 1920, § 5817; R.S. 1931, § 89-1714; C.S. 1945, § 3-2612; W.S. 1957, § 1-144; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-12-107

.

Cross references. —

As to fees of witnesses subpoenaed by county assessor, see §

18-3-204

.

As to fees for witnesses appearing before public service commission, see §

37-2-208

.

As to witness fees in causes relating to water rights, see §

41-3-328

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to summon witnesses at public expense under Uniform Act to Secure Attendance of Witnesses from Without State in Criminal Proceedings, 44 ALR2d 732.

Right of witness detained in custody for future appearance to fees for such detention, 50 ALR2d 1439.

Allowance, as taxable costs, of witness fees and mileage of stockholders, directors, officers and employees of corporate litigant, 57 ALR2d 1243.

Allowance of mileage or witness fees with respect to witnesses who were not called to testify or not permitted to do so when called, 22 ALR3d 675.

§ 1-12-106.
Contempt of court by witness.

Disobedience of a subpoena,
refusal to be sworn except for refusal to pay fees on demand, or refusal
to answer as a witness or to subscribe a deposition when lawfully
ordered, may be punished as a contempt of the court or officer who
required the attendance or testimony of the witness.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 260; R.S. 1887, § 2600; R.S. 1899, § 3694; C.S. 1910, § 4549; C.S. 1920, § 5818; R.S. 1931, § 89-1715; C.S. 1945, § 3-2613; W.S. 1957, § 1-145; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-12-108

.

Cross references. —

As to refusal of witness to answer questions in connection with discovery, see Rule 37, W.R.C.P.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Romsa v. Grace, 43 Wyo. 454, 5 P.2d 301,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(1931).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Refusal to give self-incriminating evidence before grand jury as contempt, 38 ALR2d 225.

Perjury or false swearing by witness as contempt, 89 ALR2d 1258.

Right, and remedy for enforcement of right, of defendant in criminal case to interview or confer with prospective witness in custody of public institution, 14 ALR3d 652.

Intoxication of witness or attorney as contempt of court, 46 ALR4th 238.

§ 1-12-107.
Attachment of witness who disobeys subpoena.

When a witness fails
to attend in obedience to a subpoena, the court or officer before
whom his attendance is required may issue an attachment to the sheriff
of the county commanding him to arrest and bring the person named
before the court at a time and place fixed in the attachment, to give
his testimony and answer for the contempt. If the attachment is not
for immediately bringing the witness before the court or officer,
a sum may be fixed in which the witness may give bond with surety
for his appearance. The sum shall be endorsed on the back of the attachment.
If no sum is fixed and endorsed, it shall be one hundred dollars ($100.00).
If the witness was not personally served, the court may order him
to show cause why an attachment should not issue against him.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 261; R.S. 1887, § 2601; R.S. 1899, § 3695; C.S. 1910, § 4550; C.S. 1920, § 5819; R.S. 1931, § 89-1716; C.S. 1945, § 3-2614; W.S. 1957, § 1-146; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-12-109

.

Cross references. —

As to attachment of the person generally, see §§

1-15-201

to

1-15-212

.

As to attachment for contempt in case of failure of witness to appear or testify before court commissioner in probate matters, see §

2-2-108

.

As to disobeying subpoena, see §

6-5-306

.

Applied

in

Caton v. State, 709 P.2d 1260,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 621

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Romsa v. Grace, 43 Wyo. 454, 5 P.2d 301,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(1931).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Power to compel expert to testify, 77 ALR2d 1182.

§ 1-12-108.
Punishment for contempt by witness.

Punishment for the contempt mentioned in W.S.

1-12-106

is as follows:

When the witness fails to attend in obedience to a subpoena, the court or officer may fine him not more than fifty dollars ($50.00);

In other cases the court or officer may fine the witness not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor less than five dollars ($5.00), or may imprison him in the county jail until he submits to be sworn, testifies or gives his deposition.

The fine imposed shall be paid into the county treasury.

The witness is also liable to the party injured for any damages occasioned by his failure to attend, his refusal to be sworn, to testify or give his deposition.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 262; R.S. 1887, § 2602; R.S. 1899, § 3696; C.S. 1910, § 4551; C.S. 1920, § 5820; R.S. 1931, § 89-1717; C.S. 1945, § 3-2615; W.S. 1957, § 1-147; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-12-110

.

Where order to show cause in contempt proceedings was not styled in name of state,

pursuant to art. 5, § 15, Wyo. Const., does not render the commitment void, where defendant voluntarily submitted to the order of the court to show cause, which was personally served on him, and appeared in person and by counsel without questioning the jurisdiction. Ex parte Bergman, 3 Wyo. 396, 26 P. 914,

1890 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1890).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Romsa v. Grace, 43 Wyo. 454, 5 P.2d 301,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(1931).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Tort or statutory liability for failure or refusal of witness to give testimony, 61 ALR3d 1297.

§ 1-12-109.
Discharge of imprisoned witness.

Upon application of a
witness imprisoned by an officer, a judge of the supreme court or
district court may discharge him if it appears that his imprisonment
is illegal.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 263; R.S. 1887, § 2603; R.S. 1899, § 3697; C.S. 1910, § 4552; C.S. 1920, § 5821; R.S. 1931, § 89-1718; C.S. 1945, § 3-2616; W.S. 1957, § 1-148; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-12-111

.

§ 1-12-110.
Attachment for arrest or order of commitment; execution.

Every attachment for
the arrest or order of commitment to prison of a witness by a court
or officer must be under the seal of the court or officer, if the
officer has an official seal, and must specify particularly the cause
of the arrest or commitment. If the commitment is for a refusal to
answer a question, the question must be stated in the order and the
order of commitment directed to the sheriff of the county where the
witness resides or may be found at that time. It shall be executed
by committing the witness to the jail of the county and delivering
a copy of the order to the jailer.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 264; R.S. 1887, § 2604; R.S. 1899, § 3698; C.S. 1910, § 4553; C.S. 1920, § 5822; R.S. 1931, § 89-1719; C.S. 1945, § 3-2617; W.S. 1957, § 1-149; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-12-112

.

§ 1-12-111.
Procuring testimony of imprisoned witness.

When it is necessary
to procure testimony of a person confined in the state penitentiary
or any jail or reformatory, in the trial of any issue in an indictment
or information, or in any hearing before a grand jury, the court may
order a subpoena issued, directed to the warden of the state penitentiary
or the superintendent of the jail or reformatory commanding him to
bring the witness named in the subpoena before the court. The warden,
superintendent or sheriff shall take the witness before the court
at the time and place named in the subpoena and hold him until he
is discharged by the court. When discharged he shall be returned by
the officer to the place of imprisonment from which he was taken.
The officer may command such assistance as he deems proper for the
safe transportation of the witness. When the witness is in attendance
of any court he may be placed for safekeeping in the jail of the county.
The county in which the offense was alleged to have been committed
shall pay the actual and necessary expenses of producing, keeping
and returning the witness.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 265; R.S. 1887, § 2605; R.S. 1899, § 3699; Laws 1905, ch. 6, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 4554; C.S. 1920, § 5823; R.S. 1931, § 89-1720; C.S. 1945, § 3-2618; W.S. 1957, § 1-150; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-12-113

.

In general. —

Sentence for one felony does not bar prosecution for another, and a convict is not exempt from trial and sentence for another crime committed before or during imprisonment. State v. Keefe, 17 Wyo. 227, 98 P. 122,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1908).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Issuance by federal court, pursuant to 28 USC § 2241(c)(5), of writ of habeas corpus ad testificandum requiring presence of prisoner to testify at civil or criminal trial, 65 ALR Fed 321.

§ 1-12-112.
Taking of prisoner's deposition.

While a prisoner’s deposition
is being taken he shall remain in the custody of the officer having
charge of him. The officer shall afford reasonable facilities for
the taking of the deposition.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 266; R.S. 1887, § 2606; R.S. 1899, § 3700; C.S. 1910, § 4555; C.S. 1920, § 5824; R.S. 1931, § 89-1721; C.S. 1945, § 3-2619; W.S. 1957, § 1-151; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-12-114

.

§ 1-12-113.
Immunity of witness obeying subpoena.

A witness may not be
served with a summons or sued in a county in which he does not reside
while going, returning or attending in obedience to a subpoena.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 267; R.S. 1887, § 2607; R.S. 1899, § 3701; C.S. 1910, § 4556; C.S. 1920, § 5825; R.S. 1931, § 89-1722; C.S. 1945, § 3-2620; W.S. 1957, § 1-152; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-12-115

.

§ 1-12-114.
Oath of witness.

Before testifying the
witness shall be sworn to testify the truth, the whole truth and nothing
but the truth.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 268; R.S. 1887, § 2608; R.S. 1899, § 3702; C.S. 1910, § 4557; C.S. 1920, § 5826; R.S. 1931, § 89-1723; C.S. 1945, § 3-2621; W.S. 1957, § 1-153; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-12-116

.

Cross references. —

As to form of oath, see §

1-2-101

.

As to officers authorized to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

As to affirmation rather than oath, see §

1-2-103

.

§ 1-12-115.
Testimony for use in foreign jurisdiction.

Whenever any mandate,
writ or commission is issued from any court of record in any foreign
jurisdiction, or whenever upon notice or agreement it is required
to take the testimony of a witness in this state, the witness may
be compelled to appear and testify in the same manner and by the same
process as employed for taking testimony in matters pending in the
courts of this state.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 47, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 89-1901; C.S. 1945, § 3-2928; W.S. 1957, § 1-158; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-12-117.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 4, ch. 47, Laws 1927, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Use, in federal criminal prosecution, of deposition of absent witness taken in foreign country, as affected by Federal Rule of Criminal Procedure 15(b) and (d), requiring presence of accused and that deposition be taken in manner provided in civil actions, 105 ALR Fed 537.

§ 1-12-116.
Confidential communications between family violence and sexual assault
advocate and victim.

As used in this section:

“Advocate” or “family violence or sexual assault advocate” means a person who is employed by or volunteers services to any family violence and sexual assault program, who is certified by the program as having undergone at least forty (40) hours of crisis advocacy training and whose work is directed and supervised under a family violence and sexual assault program;

“Confidential communication” means information transmitted in confidence between a victim and an advocate in the course of that relationship and includes all information received by, and any report, working paper or document prepared by the advocate in the course of that relationship;

“Crisis services to victims of family violence and sexual assault” means emergency and follow-up intervention, information, referral services and medical, legal and social services advocacy;

“Family violence and sexual assault program” means a program whose primary purpose is to offer shelter and crisis services to victims of family violence and sexual assault through any community facility or center;

“Shelter” means a place of temporary refuge, offered on a twenty-four (24) hour, seven (7) day per week basis to victims and their children;

“Victim” means a person who has been subjected to sexual assault as defined by W.S. 6-2-301(a)(v), incest as defined by W.S.

6-4-402

or domestic abuse as defined by W.S. 35-21-102(a)(iii).

Except as provided by W.S.

14-3-210

, a person exempted from testifying under the provisions of W.S.

1-12-116

shall not be examined as a witness in any civil, criminal, legislative or administrative proceeding concerning the following communications and information:

An advocate shall not testify concerning a confidential communication made by a victim in the course of that relationship, except the advocate:

May testify:

With the express consent of the victim; or

If the victim voluntarily testifies, provided the advocate’s testimony shall be limited to the same subject matter.

May be compelled to testify if the victim is unable to testify due to death or incompetence.

Any employee of a family violence and sexual assault program who has access to confidential communication shall not testify except in those circumstances where the advocate may testify.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 127, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to privileged communication by a licensed or certified mental health professional, see §

33-38-113

.

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Evidence — Recognition of a Federal Psychotherapist-Patient Privilege. Jaffee v. Redmond, 518 U.S. 1, 116 S. Ct. 1923, 135 L. Ed. 2d 337, 1996 U.S. LEXIS 3879 (1996),” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 873 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Constitutionality, with respect to accused's rights to information or confrontation, of statute according confidentiality to sex crime victim's communications to sexual counselor, 43 ALR4th 395.

Validity, construction and application of statute limiting physician-patient privilege in judicial proceedings relating to child abuse or neglect, 44 ALR4th 649.